Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
463

PRIVATE
INVESTIGATORS AND GUARDS

Section

463-1 Definitions

463-2 Board of private detectives and guards;

appointment; qualifications; term

463-3 Policy; powers and duties

463-4 Procedure in appeal of denial of licensure,
revocation,

or suspension of licenses

463-5 Private detectives and detective agencies;
license

required

463-6 Private detectives and detective agencies;

qualifications for license

463-7 Guard and guard agencies; license required

463-8 Principal guards and guard agencies;
qualifications

for license

463-8.5 Guards; concurrent employment

463-9 Form of application for license or
registration

463-10 Licenses; fees; biennial renewal of
licenses; inactive

license

463-10.5 Guards; registration, instruction,
training, testing,

and continuing education required; renewal
of

registration

463-11 Association with government not to be
implied

463-12 Bond

463-13 Exemptions

463-14 Contingent fee

463-15 Penalties

463-16 Repealed

463-17 Provisions severable

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next